Maine, session 132, LD2008.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
EDUCATION, DEPARTMENT OF
General Purpose Aid for Local Schools 0308
Initiative: Provides one-time funds to the Maine School of Science and Mathematics for
infrastructure upgrades to the school's dormitory.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $300,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $300,000
Page 1 - 132LR2839(05)